test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_meridud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - meriduđ: # MLO & Elsa-ákku, tärhistum; väädis!
    meriduđ+V+Inf: meriduđ
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meriduum
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: meriduuh
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meriduvvoo
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: meriduvvoon
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: meriduuvettee
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: meriduvvov
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: meridup
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: meriduuvetteđ
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meriduvvojeh
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: meriduvvim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: meriduvvih
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: meridui
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: meriduim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: meriduid
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: meriduin
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: meriduim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: meriduid
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: meriduvvojii
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Sg1: meriduuččim
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Sg2: meriduuččih
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Sg3: meriduuččij
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Du1: meriduuččáim
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Du2: meriduuččáid
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Du3: meriduuččáin
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Pl1: meriduuččijm
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Pl2: meriduuččijd
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Pl3: meriduuččii
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Sg1: meridužžeem
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Sg2: meridužžeeh
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Sg3: meriduš                # meriduž
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Du1: meridužžeen
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Du2: meridušvettee           # meridužvettee
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Du3: meridužžuv
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Pl1: meridužžep
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Pl2: meridušvetteđ           # meridužvetteđ
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Pl3: meridužeh
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: meriduvvum            # ø
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: meriduu
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: meridus
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du1: meridoon    
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du2: meridoo    
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du3: meridus     
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: meridup      
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: meriduđ              
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: meridus
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: meriduu
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: meriduččii
    meriduđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: meridužžii
    meriduđ+V+PrsPrc: meriduvvee
    meriduđ+V+PrfPrc: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Actio: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Ess: meriduumin
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Loc: meriduumist
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Ill: meriduumân
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Com: meriduudijn
    meriduđ+V+VAbess: meriduuhánnáá
    
  Verb - teddiluđ: # MLO & Elsa-ákku
    teddiluđ+V+Inf: teddiluđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teddiluum
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddiluvvoo
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: teddiluvveen
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: teddiluuvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: teddiluvvov
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teddilup
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teddiluvvojeh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: teddiluvvim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teddiluvvih
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teddilui
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: teddiluin
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teddiluvvii
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg1: teddiluuččim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg2: teddiluuččih
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg3: teddiluuččij
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du1: teddiluuččáim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du2: teddiluuččáid
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du3: teddiluuččáin
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl1: teddiluuččijm
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl2: teddiluuččijd
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl3: teddiluuččij
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg1: teddilužžeem
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg2: teddilužžeeh
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg3: teddiluš            # teddiluž
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du1: teddilužžeen
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du2: teddilušvettee      # teddilužvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du3: teddilužžuv
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl1: teddilužžep
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl2: teddilušvetteđ      # teddilužvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl3: teddilužeh
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: teddiluvvum           # ø
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: teddilus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du1: teddiloon      
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du2: teddiluvvee          
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du3: teddilus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: teddilup 
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: teddiluđ              
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: teddilus   
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: teddiluččii
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: teddilužžii
    teddiluđ+V+PrsPrc: teddiluvvee
    teddiluđ+V+PrfPrc: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ess: teddiluumin
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Loc: teddiluumist
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ill: teddiluumân
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Com: teddiluudijn
    teddiluđ+V+VAbess: teddiluuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - ruásmuttuđ: # # MLO & Elsa-ákku
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Inf: ruásmuttuđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruásmuttuum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruásmuttuuh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruásmuttuvá
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruásmuttuvveen
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruásmuttuuvettee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruásmuttuvvov
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ruásmuttup
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ruásmuttuuvetteđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruásmuttuvvojeh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruásmuttuvvim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ruásmuttuvvih
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruásmuttui
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ruásmuttuim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ruásmuttuid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ruásmuttuin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ruásmuttuim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ruásmuttuid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruásmuttuvvii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: ruásmuttuuččim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: ruásmuttuuččih
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: ruásmuttuuččij
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du1: ruásmuttuuččáim
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du2: ruásmuttuuččáid
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du3: ruásmuttuuččáin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: ruásmuttuuččijm
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: ruásmuttuuččijd
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: ruásmuttuuččij
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: ruásmuttužžeem
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: ruásmuttužžeeh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ruásmuttuš              # ruásmuttuž
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du1: ruásmuttužžeen
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du2: ruásmuttušvettee        # ruásmuttužvettee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du3: ruásmuttužžuv
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: ruásmuttužžep
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ruásmuttušvetteđ        # ruásmuttužvetteđ
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: ruásmuttužeh
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: ruásmuttuvvum         # ø
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ruásmuttuu
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ruásmuttus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ruásmuttoon        # ruásmuttoon
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ruásmuttoo         # ruásmuttoo
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ruásmuttus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ruásmuttop         # ruásmuttup
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ruásmuttuđ            
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ruásmuttus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruásmuttuu
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: ruásmuttuččii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ruásmuttužžii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+PrsPrc: ruásmuttuvvee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+PrfPrc: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ess: ruásmuttuumin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Loc: ruásmuttuumist
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ill: ruásmuttuumân
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Com: ruásmuttuudijn
    ruásmuttuđ+V+VAbess: ruásmuttuuhánnáá
    
